Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6653YC (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 2.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Commencing on the convening of the 3 Ninety-second General Assembly in January 2027, members of the 4 general assembly shall be entitled to a one-time reimbursement 5 of up to five thousand dollars for the installation of a home 6 security system and a monthly reimbursement of up to one 7 hundred dollars for the operation of a home security system. 8 A member of the general assembly shall submit a receipt for 9 reimbursement under this subsection to the administrative 10 officer of the memberâs chamber. A claim under this subsection 11 shall be included with and paid upon submission of travel and 12 expense allowance vouchers to the director of the department of 13 administrative services under subsection 4. 14 Sec. 2. Section 7.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. The governor and lieutenant governor 17 shall be entitled to a one-time reimbursement of up to five 18 thousand dollars for the installation of a home security system 19 and a monthly reimbursement of up to one hundred dollars for 20 the operation of a home security system. The governor and 21 lieutenant governor shall submit receipts for reimbursement to 22 the director of the department of administrative services. 23 Sec. 3. Section 9.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 9.5 Salary ââ expenses . 26 1. The salary of the secretary of state shall be as fixed 27 by the general assembly. 28 2. The secretary of state shall be entitled to a 29 one-time reimbursement of up to five thousand dollars for 30 the installation of a home security system and a monthly 31 reimbursement of up to one hundred dollars for the operation of 32 a home security system. The secretary of state shall submit 33 receipts for reimbursement to the director of the department of 34 administrative services. 35 -1- LSB 6653YC (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ Sec. 4. Section 11.30, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 11.30 Salary ââ expenses . 3 1. The salary of the auditor of state shall be as fixed by 4 the general assembly. 5 2. The auditor of state shall be entitled to a one-time 6 reimbursement of up to five thousand dollars for the 7 installation of a home security system and a monthly 8 reimbursement of up to one hundred dollars for the operation 9 of a home security system. The auditor of state shall submit 10 receipts for reimbursement to the director of the department of 11 administrative services. 12 Sec. 5. Section 12.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 12.18 Salary ââ expenses . 15 1. The salary of the treasurer of state shall be as fixed 16 by the general assembly. 17 2. The treasurer of state shall be entitled to a 18 one-time reimbursement of up to five thousand dollars for 19 the installation of a home security system and a monthly 20 reimbursement of up to one hundred dollars for the operation of 21 a home security system. The treasurer of state shall submit 22 receipts for reimbursement to the director of the department of 23 administrative services. 24 Sec. 6. Section 13.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 13.9 Salary ââ expenses . 27 1. The salary of the attorney general shall be as fixed 28 by the general assembly, and the salaries of the chief deputy 29 attorney general and other deputy and assistant attorneys 30 general shall be such as may be fixed by law. 31 2. The attorney general shall be entitled to a one-time 32 reimbursement of up to five thousand dollars for the 33 installation of a home security system and a monthly 34 reimbursement of up to one hundred dollars for the operation 35 -2- LSB 6653YC (1) 91 ss/ns 2/ 3 H.F. _____ of a home security system. The attorney general shall submit 1 receipts for reimbursement to the director of the department of 2 administrative services. 3 Sec. 7. Section 159.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 159.19 Salary ââ expenses . 6 1. The salary of the secretary of agriculture shall be as 7 fixed by the general assembly. 8 2. The secretary of agriculture shall be entitled to a 9 one-time reimbursement of up to five thousand dollars for 10 the installation of a home security system and a monthly 11 reimbursement of up to one hundred dollars for the operation 12 of a home security system. The secretary of agriculture shall 13 submit receipts for reimbursement to the director of the 14 department of administrative services. 15